apertium-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="søskende__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~n / ~ / ~ -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mis__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~sen / ~ser / ~serne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\'__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ser</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>serne</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="es__n" c="antoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~sen / ~ser / ~serne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\'__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ser</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>serne</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="es_no-cp__n" c="antoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~sen / ~ser / ~serne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\'s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ser</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>serne</l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fængs/el__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~el / ~let | (~elet) / ~ler / ~lerne -->
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>   <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>elet</l>  <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>   <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerne</l> <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sed/del__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~del / ~len / ~ler / ~lerne -->
  <e>       <p><l>del</l>    <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>    <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>    <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerne</l>  <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="trus/sel__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~del / ~len / ~ler / ~lerne -->
  <e>       <p><l>sel</l>    <r>sel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>    <r>sel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>    <r>sel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerne</l>  <r>sel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="øl__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~len / ~ | (~ler) / ~lene | (~lerne) -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ler</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lerne</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/or__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~or / ~oren / ~ødre / ~ødrene -->
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>     <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oren</l>   <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødre</l>   <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødrene</l> <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ton__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~net | (~nen) / ~ | (~s) / ~nene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nen</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="'_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nene</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ank/er__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~er / ~eret | (~ret / ~re / ~rene -->
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eret</l>   <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ret</l>    <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>   <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/oder__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~oder / ~oderen / ~ødre / ~ødrene -->
  <e>       <p><l>oder</l>   <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oderen</l> <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødre</l>   <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødrene</l> <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bestemor">                  <i>bedstem</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="broder">          <i>br</i><par n="m/oder__n"/></e>
<e lm="bror">            <i>br</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="eksempel">        <i>eksemp</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="es">              <i>es</i><par n="es_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="farbror">         <i>farbr</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="foster">                    <i>fost</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="fængsel">         <i>fængs</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="gidsel">                    <i>gids</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="halvbror">                  <i>halvbr</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="hassel">                    <i>has</i><par n="trus/sel__n"/></e>
<e lm="iris">            <i>iris</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="jordemor">        <i>jordem</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="kabel">           <i>kab</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="kloanker" a="PT" c="domain:sjöochhav"><i>kloank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="moder">           <i>m</i><par n="m/oder__n"/></e>
<e lm="mor">             <i>m</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="bosætningsmønster">         <i>bosætningsmønst</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="penis">           <i>penis</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="seddel">          <i>sed</i><par n="sed/del__n"/></e>
<e lm="skålanker" a="PT" c="domain:sjöochhav"><i>skålank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="søskende">        <i>søskende</i><par n="søskende__n"/></e>
<e lm="tempel">          <i>temp</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="ton">             <i>ton</i><par n="ton__n"/></e>
<e lm="trussel">         <i>trus</i><par n="trus/sel__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="øl" c="en øl">    <i>øl</i><par n="øl__n"/></e>
<e lm="klister">                   <i>klist</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="kunstcenter">               <i>kunstcent</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="livscyklus">                <i>livscyklus</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="møbel">                     <i>møb</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="primus">                    <i>primus</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="puddel">                    <i>pud</i><par n="sed/del__n"/></e>
<e lm="register">                  <i>regist</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="skicenter">                 <i>skicent</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="storebror">                 <i>storebr</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="syssel">                    <i>sys</i><par n="trus/sel__n"/></e>
<e lm="søkabel">                <i>søkab</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="almenpraksis"><i>almenpraksis</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="ammunitionslager"><i>ammunitionslag</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="bokøl"><i>bokøl</i><par n="øl__n"/></e>
<e lm="bøddel"><i>bød</i><par n="sed/del__n"/></e>
<e lm="daddel"><i>dad</i><par n="sed/del__n"/></e>
<e lm="demokratiseringsproces"><i>demokratiseringsproces</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="dødvægtton"><i>dødvægtton</i><par n="ton__n"/></e>
<e lm="eksportøl"><i>eksportøl</i><par n="øl__n"/></e>
<e lm="ældstebror"><i>ældstebr</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="farbror"><i>farbr</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="fredskongres"><i>fredskongres</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="fugleskræmsel"><i>fugleskræms</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="gebis"><i>gebis</i><par n="es__n"/></e>
<e lm="gudbrandsdøl"><i>gudbrandsdøl</i><par n="øl__n"/></e>
<e lm="husk"><i>husk</i><par n="øl__n"/></e>
<e lm="kaktus"><i>kaktus</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="kasus"><i>kasus</i><par n="øl__n"/></e>
<e lm="kiloton"><i>kiloton</i><par n="ton__n"/></e>
<e lm="kølelager"><i>kølelag</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="konfirmationstøj"><i>konfirmationstøj</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="lagerøl"><i>lagerøl</i><par n="øl__n"/></e>
<e lm="landsfængsel"><i>landsfængs</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="morbror"><i>morbr</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="motocross"><i>motocross</i><par n="es__n"/></e>
<e lm="parnas"><i>parnas</i><par n="es__n"/></e>
<e lm="registerton"><i>registerton</i><par n="ton__n"/></e>
<e lm="regres"><i>regres</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="skræmsel"><i>skræms</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="trolleybus"><i>trolleybus</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
